Washington statutes.
RCW 19.150.140

Other rights not impaired.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to impair or affect the right of the parties to create additional rights, duties, and obligations which do not conflict with the provisions of this chapter. The rights provided by this chapter shall be in addition to all other rights provided by law to a creditor against his or her debtor.

[ 1988 c 240 s 15.]